Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 25

Public Hearing Requirements Prior to Location of Community-Based Residential Facilities

12-25-101. Location or construction of residential facilities for sexual or violent offenders — Public hearings.

(1)No state agency, board, commission, or governing body of any municipality or county shall approve the location or construction of any community-based residential facility housing juveniles or adults adjudicated or convicted of any sexual or violent offense or any other offense that would constitute a Class C felony or higher, even if the facility otherwise conforms to applicable zoning ordinances, until a public hearing is conducted in the municipality or county of the proposed location of the facility at least thirty (30) days prior to the contracting for the acquisition of any property on which to locate the proposed facility or any existing structure in which to locate the proposed facility by the owner, operator, or care provider of the proposed facility.

No community-based residential facility housing juveniles or adults adjudicated or convicted of any sexual or violent offense or any other criminal offense that would constitute a Class C felony or higher shall be located or constructed within any municipality or county of this state until a public hearing is conducted in the municipality or county of the proposed location of the facility at least thirty (30) days prior to the contracting for the acquisition of any property on which to locate the proposed facility or any existing structure in which to locate the proposed facility by the owner, operator, or care provider of the proposed facility.

All residents within one thousand feet (1000') of the proposed location of the facility shall be notified by mail at least ten (10) days prior to the day of the hearing.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 626, § 1; 2005, No. 1962, § 45.